Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
ESTABLISHMENT OF SUBDIVISION
EXEMPTION PLATS FOR THE PURPOSE
OF CORRECTING LEGAL DESCRIPTIONS

30-28-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, in certain areas of the state, property has been conveyed as irregular parcels or as parcels platted prior to establishment of current subdivision regulations. Situations exist where the physical layout of lots conveyed in this manner are not in dispute, but the legal descriptions of these lots contain inaccuracies such that conflicts exist in the written record locating property boundaries. These conflicts in the legal descriptions jeopardize the ability of property owners to utilize and to convey their property. These conflicts often affect a number of properties such that the most efficient means of correcting them is to create a subdivision exemption plat for the area which can be used as a uniform basis for legal descriptions. The inability of property owners to resolve conflicts in legal descriptions is contrary to the public welfare and interferes with efficient and economic development and utilization of land.

It is the purpose of this part 3 to provide for the preparation of subdivision exemption plats for unplatted areas or for areas platted prior to current subdivision regulations which can be used as a uniform basis for legal descriptions of such areas.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1117, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Irregular, divided area" means an area containing parcels of less than thirty-five acres which are either irregular parcels or parcels which were platted prior to June 1, 1972.

"Irregular parcel" means a parcel of land which is not uniquely defined on a subdivision plat but which is described by any of the following methods:

An aliquot part of a section;

A metes and bounds description;

A book and page or reception number reference;

Any so-called "assessor's tract";

A description which calls only for the owner's or adjoiner's name.

"Land division study area" means an area of land which qualifies as an irregular, divided area as defined in subsection (1) of this section, and which has been designated by the board of county commissioners for the purpose of preparing a plan for platting in accordance with the provisions of section 30-28-304.

"Land surveyor" means a person registered or licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 120 of title 12.

"Parcel" means a contiguous area of land, except for intervening easements and rights-of-way with a continuous boundary defined either by the methods specified in subsection (2) of this section, when the description of the parcel has been recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder or by reference to a recorded subdivision plat.

"Property owner" or "owner" means the person or persons who hold title to a parcel of land as shown on the property tax assessment roll in the office of the county assessor.

"Subdivision exemption plat" or "exemption plat" means a subdivision plat which depicts a division of land or the creation of an interest in property for which the board of county commissioners has granted an exemption from subdivision regulations pursuant to section 30-28-101 (10)(d) and which is suitable for recording pursuant to section 38-51-105, C.R.S.

"Subdivision plat" means a map of a platted subdivision recorded for the purpose of creating land parcels which can be identified uniquely by reference to such map.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 94:

(7) amended, p. 1509, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1719, § 216, effective October 1.

30-28-303. Creation of land division study area.

Upon petition of the property owners who represent not less than ten percent of the land in an irregular, divided area, the board of county commissioners may create a land division study area.

At any regular meeting of the board of county commissioners, the board may designate an area of land as a land division study area if:

The notice and comment provisions of subsection (3) of this section have been complied with; and

The board finds that the area proposed for inclusion in the study qualifies as an irregular, divided area.

Prior to designating an area of land as a land division study area, the board of county commissioners shall publish its intent to consider such designation thirty days prior to the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall include the time and place of the hearing and an invitation to the public to comment on the proposed designation.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-304. Preparation and adoption of plan for platting notice - withdraw from plan - requirements for adoption.

The board of county commissioners shall have prepared a plan for platting the land division study area.

The plan shall include the estimated cost for preparing a subdivision exemption plat and the estimated amount which must be assessed against each property included in the plan in order to repay the cost of the exemption plat. Costs associated with the following activities shall be eligible for inclusion in the cost estimate:

Surveying and engineering;

Drafting;

Computerized mapping;

Aerial photography;

Monumentation;

Title research and documentation;

Preparation of deeds;

Court costs; and

Project administration.

In addition to the costs set forth in subparagraphs (I) to (IX) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the estimated cost may include a contingency amount of up to fifteen percent of the total costs set forth in such subparagraphs.

The board of county commissioners shall conduct a public hearing to consider adoption of the plan for platting described in subsection (1) of this section and to allow owners of property in the land division study area an opportunity to register either their agreement or objection to having their property included in any subdivision exemption plat for the land division study area.

Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least thirty days prior to the hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and by certified mail to owners of property included in the land division study area. In addition to the time and place of the hearing, the notice shall include at a minimum the following information:

A map showing the properties included in the land division study area, including the approximate location of parcel boundaries;

The purpose for which the study area was created;

The process by which a subdivision exemption plat for the land division study area can be prepared;

The cost estimates for preparation of a subdivision exemption plat, with conspicuous notification that such costs would be assessed against the properties included in the exemption plat;

The opportunity for the property owner to object to this property being included in any subdivision exemption plat for the land division study area; and

A copy of the plan for platting prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Any property owner may elect to withdraw from the plan for platting described in subsection (1) of this section by submitting a written request by certified mail to the county clerk and recorder prior to the date of the hearing or by appearing at the hearing and informing the board of county commissioners of his decision to withdraw from the plan.

The board of county commissioners shall exclude properties of owners who request withdrawal pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) from any plan adopted for platting the land division study area.

The board of county commissioners shall not adopt a plan for platting if the withdrawal of property owners from participation would result in an increase in the amount of the assessment against the remaining properties from that amount which was stated in the plan, unless written consent is obtained from all owners who elect to participate in the plan for platting.

Prior to adoption of any plan for platting a land division study area:

The board of county commissioners shall obtain written consent from each property owner who elects to participate in the plan. Consent on the part of a property owner to participate in the plan shall constitute consent to the following:

Preparation of a subdivision exemption plat for his property;

Temporary conveyance of title to his property to the district court as provided in section 30-28-307;

Payment of the assessment against his property for the cost of preparing the subdivision exemption plat;

Each property owner participating in the plan shall provide evidence of title insurance or other evidence of title which is acceptable to the board of county commissioners for the property which shall be included in the plan for platting. The board of county commissioners shall have the authority to evaluate evidence of title and to exclude properties where title has not been proven to the board's satisfaction.

The board of county commissioners shall adopt the plan for platting by resolution by a majority vote of the full membership of the board.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1119, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-305. Preparation of subdivision exemption plat.

The board of county commissioners shall have a subdivision exemption plat prepared for those properties in the land division study area for which the owners have:

Not elected to withdraw from the plan as provided in section 30-28-304 (3);

Given written consent to participate in the plan for platting and have supplied adequate evidence of title as required by section 30-28-304 (4).

The exemption plat shall be prepared by a professional land surveyor, and shall assign a lot number to each of the properties included in the exemption plat.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1121, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-306. Preparation of deeds.

The board of county commissioners shall have deeds prepared for each of the properties included in the subdivision exemption plat, using the exemption plat as the basis for the legal description of such properties. Deeds prepared under the provisions of this section shall constitute a legal means for the conveyance of property only upon recordation of the subdivision exemption plat in the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1121, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-307. Conveyance of title to district court.

Upon completion of the preparation of the subdivision exemption plat and of the deeds for the parcels included in the exemption plat, each property owner participating in the subdivision exemption plat shall convey the existing title to his property to the district court having jurisdiction over the property which is to be platted.

The district court shall hold each title in escrow and shall act as the property owner for all properties conveyed in this manner for purposes of executing the owner's certificate for consent to the subdivision of the properties as indicated in the subdivision exemption plat.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1121, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-308. Recordation of subdivision exemption plat.

Upon execution of the owner's certificate by the district court, the board of county commissioners shall have the subdivision exemption plat recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1121, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-309. Reconveyance of title to property owners.

Upon recordation of the subdivision exemption plat by the county clerk and recorder, the district court shall reconvey the titles held by the court pursuant to section 30-28-307 to the property owners who conveyed title to their properties to the district court. The district court shall convey title by means of the deeds which were prepared in accordance with section 30-28-306.

A failure to record the subdivision exemption plat and to reconvey title from the district court to the participating property owners within five working days from the date title is conveyed to the district court shall void the original conveyance to the district court.

Voiding of the original conveyance shall not preclude subsequent attempts to convey property to the district court for the purposes stated in this part 3, and the limitation on the length of time the district court may hold title to properties so conveyed shall apply to any subsequent conveyance attempts.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1121, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-310. Assessment of costs.

The board of county commissioners shall have the authority to assess all eligible costs incurred in preparing the subdivision exemption plat against the properties included in the exemption plat. The maximum amount of such assessment shall be the maximum cost estimate which was included in the plan for platting. The board of county commissioners may establish a schedule of not more than ten years for repayment of the assessment.

The assessment shall become part of the property taxes owed for the affected properties, and the board of county commissioners shall have power to collect delinquent assessments in the same manner that delinquent property taxes are collected. The amount assessed against each of the affected properties shall be proportionate to the benefit received.

The district court shall have the authority to charge for the costs incurred in administering sections 30-28-307 and 30-28-309. Such costs shall be paid by the county at the time these duties are performed, and the county shall be reimbursed for such costs by adding a proportionate amount of such costs to the property owners' assessments which are levied in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1122, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-311. Cancellation of process.

After adoption of the plan for platting as set forth in section 30-28-304, the board of county commissioners shall cancel the procedures set forth in this part 3 for the creation of a subdivision exemption plat upon:

Written request from at least seventy-five percent of the participating property owners; or

Refusal on the part of one or more property owners to convey title as required by section 30-28-307.

The board of county commissioners shall have the authority to assess costs as provided in section 30-28-310 against the properties included in the adopted plan for work completed prior to cancellation of the process.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1122, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-312. Limitation on liability.

Property owners and any persons representing themselves as property owners who convey property to the district court under the provisions of this part 3 shall bear full responsibility for the condition of the title they hold to the property and for any subsequent litigation regarding defective title. Administration by the board of county commissioners and the district court of the procedures set forth in this part 3 shall not confer liability upon them or anyone in their employ for any litigation regarding defective title of any property which is included in a subdivision exemption plat prepared pursuant to this part 3.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1122, § 1, effective April 20.

30-28-313. Severability.

If any section, clause, provision, or portion of this part 3 shall be found unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this part 3 shall not be affected.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1122, § 1, effective April 20.